<font size="4"><b>Chapter 7</b></font>

TWO orderlies came rather quickly into the room, and he
galvanized his body to defend and fight. But looking with
lightning glances from one to the other, and seeing they carried
a basin of water, and towels, he realised they meant him no
harm. He uncoiled himself and submitted weakly to being
washed. Under his breath he muttered Italian words.


They looked like big men and he had not seen them before.
One smiled and joked, and seemed unafraid of him; the other,
he sensed, was one who both felt and caused fear. They wasted
no time in their work but proceeded with the rough efficiency of
meat dressers. Soon they had washed around his bandages and
adroitly rolled him from one side to the other to remove the
sheets. <i>Grazie</i>, he murmured frequently. They fed his extreme
hunger. They shaved him with a dull blade raspingly. Then,
in clean sheets, propped against two pillows, they left him.


They had hardly spoken in the room but now he could hear
them in the corridor. Expressions like shore and are you
kidding? came through to him, and he realised suddenly these
were Canadian voices. He let this fact settle in his mind and
nodded his head several times with an effort to concentrate upon
it. It gave him a small sense of assurance.


Still, he kept puzzling over what had happened in the last
few days. He knew he was in England. He recalled a great pier
and several ambulance journeys and of waking in a train. This
last scene kept recurring in his mind: he was in a high berth,
waking suddenly among many wounded men and several nurses,
who spoke with English voices. One pretty nurse he made jokes

[p. <i>107</i>]

Now he saw he was in a small room in what appeared to be
an army hut. He looked it over, noting everything. The walls
were made of cement. The door opened on to a corridor, and
opposite were other rooms like his own. At his side, behind
him, was a window, and a gray daylight came through it. He
was distracted by seeing the black fringe of his moustache
protruding from his upper lip. He had not seen himself in a
looking-glass for over a month, and now realised that he had
not been thinking of himself lately as a man or as a human
being even; he had been thinking more that he was a consciousness
inhabiting a sort of plant, which had been cut and trampled
on and grown putrid, but which still carried life in it. It was
odd to be reminded you were human by a moustache.


Pain, from which he had evidently taken a short holiday,
was now demanding attention. Pain ... He stared at his leg,
raising himself a little. It was in a new cast, from toes to upper
thigh, and the foot looked bulkier than before. His toes were
uncovered at the end but he could scarcely move them. The
familiar throb of pain came from the foot, centring at the arch,
where the bones were really not much more than a bundle of
splinters bound together. With care not to disturb the foot by
his own movement, he sank back against the pillows.

[p. <i>108</i>]

Quite perceptibly the sun gained in strength till the cell
became flooded in bright light.


The sun was wonderful to him. He thought: I wish I were
in my bedroll out in the field, so warm inside and yet feeling
the fresh air outside, and looking at the sky, especially at night.
If only they would leave me there ... letting nature heal me.
Bringing me food, but letting me suffer alone. He remembered
a poem in which a man asked that when he was ill he be allowed
to go out of sight of his kind, like the well-bred animal, and
see through his illness alone. That was what he wanted: to be
in the open air, alone. He made a poem for himself about it.


The next morning, in the confusion of waking, he had
forgotten what he had learnt the day before, and when he saw
white-coated men passing, he coiled up in self-protection, with
fists clenched, and called out: "Fascist pervertsyou're trying
to kill me!"


An elderly man, with a look of authority, though dressed in
a plain khaki shirt fastened at the neck with a collar button,
halted and stood in the doorway to answer him. He said in a
firm and explanatory voice:

[p. <i>109</i>]

"We are not Fascists here. We are not trying to kill you.
This is a hospital. We are trying to make you well."


Michael did not answer, but the man seemed to notice that
he understood, and passed on. The words sank into his mind
in their literal meaning. They were not trying to kill him, they
were trying to make him well. This was another assurance; he
recollected that yesterday also something good had happened
but he couldn't think what it was.


When the orderlies of the morning before entered the room,
he did remember: he was among Canadians. That was it. He
was among Canadians, and they were not trying to kill him.


He was able this time to distinguish more clearly the two
men. The one he liked was a short sturdy man, and resembled
the character actor, Jason Winter. He had an amusing, likeable
manner. Michael didn't really consider whether the man was
the actor or the orderly, or some strange blend of them both,
he thought of him as Jason. The other man was tall and handsome;
his skin was exceptionally white and there was almost
visible in him a brutal streak and a streak of fear. Though Jason
called him Boy, he called him White Jack. They seemed less
nervous of him than they had been yesterday, but never took
their eyes from him or left themselves unguarded. As before,
they wasted no time in their duties but soon left, Jason saying
something funny, and smiling, as he went out.


He soon reappeared with an officer and a dark-haired nurse.
Michael could see the officer was a colonel, or near that rank,
and that the nurse was sympathetic.


"Stop a minute," he said to him, reaching out a hand, "Tell
me about...," he waved both hands in confusion.


The colonel said firmly: "As soon as you can remember my
name, I'll stop and talk. My name is Calder, remember that,
Calder."

[p. <i>110</i>]

Then he and the nurse and the orderly all vanished quickly.
Michael didn't concentrate on remembering the name because
he was distracted by pain in his foot. It was that familiar, sharp
gnawing of Caserta and the boat. For some minutes he could
think of nothing else.


He spoke out:


"<i>Sono il mio piede</i>."


As he said it, he realised he was imitating the anguished,
tremulous accents of Mussolini's son. No, not his son, really,
but the brother of the dying Italian in the Liri Valley.


"<i>La vita e piena di dolore, e io sono il mio piede</i>."


"What does that mean?" asked a voice, a voice that sounded
vital and interested, yet uncommitted.


He lifted his head and saw a most curious mandark-skinned
but English-looking, with remarkably sensitive eyes. He was
short and slim and looked entirely self-composed. He wore an
orderly's coat.


Michael answered: "I am my foot, it means that."


"Oh," the orderly said, nodding his head slightly, in comprehension,
his eyes assuming a serious expression, as if
concealing a rising laughter.


"I am the masseur, I've been sent to look at you."


At Michael's surprise, he went on: "You've been lying in
ambulances and trains, so your muscles are probably cramped.
Here are some more pillows." He lifted them from a chair, out
of Michael's sight, and placed them behind him, then pointed
to a bandage on his arm, asking what it was.


"Just a flesh wound," Michael told him. "It should be healed
now."


The orderly lifted the skinny arm and began to massage it
expertly.


"Did you have many wounds?" he asked.

[p. <i>111</i>]

"Sixteen, but all flesh wounds, except in my foot, that's a
comminuted fracture."


"And that's why you're your foot?"


"Yes."


"What's it like to fight in battle?" he asked, the same alive
look in his eyes, and his hands continuing to knead the arm.


"Until something hits you, it's wonderfulI think sowar
begins in hospital."


"I can believe it might be wonderful, but tell me how."


"Well, for one thing, when you're in battle there is no law
you are a primitive man who makes his own law. I think of
man in society as man in prison, war releases him."


"Any other things?"


"War's the same as the bull ring and the gladiator's arena.
The trial is made. All of you against all of the enemy. Then,
you're with your friends."


The orderly didn't speak for a moment, then asked:


"And does the war outside hospital make up for the war
inside?"


"Oh, never! I don't mean that. All killing and mangling is
horrible. I'm beginning to think nothing justifies it, unless it is
to stop killing and mangling. To kill those who were exterminating
the Jews was justified ... But I don't think any way
of life or any social system is worth butchery."


"Even to defend?"


"No. We should not kill even to defend a system."


"That's why I became a masseur instead of a soldier."


"I know. I was in two minds about it at first, but now I
might be a pacifist too."


"Because...?"


"Because violence isn't just a word to me, it's a thingtoo
evil to be responsible for."

[p. <i>112</i>]

The orderly massaged the leg not in the cast, and then his
shoulders, where there were other bandages, and finally his neck.


"Where is this?" Michael asked.


"A Canadian hospital."


"But you're not Canadian?"


"No, Englishthey wanted a masseur and borrowed me
from the R.A.M.C."


"Well, we're glad to have you, but aren't there any Canadian
masseurs?"


"Evidently not for the tangle you're in."


Michael smiled faintly. To meet this kind of a man was as
reassuring in its way as to have a gunner from C Troop standing
guard at the door.


After the masseur had gone, and the door was shut, a fly,
which he had not noticed till now, executed some perfect circles
and ellipsoids and then settled with geometric precision at the
centre of the lintel. He remembered the story by Suetonius of
the mad emperor. He would spend hours alone each day engaged
in dispatching flies with a dagger, and when someone asked
once if there was anyone in there with Caesar, he was answered,
Not even a fly. Michael laughed at this ancient witticism, and
the fly buzzed an eccentric circle and returned to his post. There,
it seemed to Michael, he looked at him as if he were on sentry
duty, guarding his person.


"Fly," Michael addressed him, "come here."


After but a momentary pause, the fly flew in a straight line
to him, alighting on his bed-table, near a cup of water.


Michael observed that he was a sturdy green fly, only a few
days old. "Hum, quoth the blue fly. Ha, quoth the bee," he
said. "Quoth hum." The fly's only response was to begin to
clamber up the rounded cliff of the water cup.


"You are an obedient and geometric fly but you cannot

[p. <i>113</i>]

The fly had now reached the edge of the cup and was walking,
unaware of his mortal danger, down to the water. Michael,
feeling himself to be supernormally acute, observed the peculiar
bend of his legs, the wings, lined like leaves, the muzzle like a
red rubber tyre, white at the centre, and the long downward
feeler, tapping the ground like a blind man's stick. Inevitably,
it seemed, the fly was to slip into the water and drown. He felt
like God watching a human disaster. Down the fly went: one
leg was immersed, then the body. He doesn't know what
liquid is, he thought, and has no instinctive fear of it. The wings
were wet, the creature struggled franticallyto no purpose, he
was away from the side now, several fly-lengths away. Perhaps
he wouldn't drown, but would starve to death. But the fly was
drowning himself by his own fearful gyrations.


"Enough, fly, 'tis enough," he said, and, with a finger crooked,
dipped into the water, making a raft for the fly. Here it scrambled
and he bore it aloft, and down to the table, where it dropped off
on its back. He righted it and watched it make a slow recovery.


"Guard me always," he told it. The fly seemed to acquiesce.


The next day he could hear outside his window a truck backing
up against the hut. It must be a coal truck. There was
probably a low window near him where they sent the coal down
a chute. Suppose now he got some friends outside to paint a
coal sign on an ordinary truck, back it up to his window, and
let him climb out for a getaway? ... It must all be done quietly
and smoothly. Without a sound. He quoted:

[p. <i>114</i>]

He loved the words and the rhythm of this poem. It would
be their escape signal. He would use it to hearten the conspirators
and to summon them when the truck came. With his knuckles
he beat out the escape rhythm on the cement wall. It reverberated
mightily in his mind:


A nurse came in the door with White Jack. She bore a penicillin
needle in her hand.


"Not again!" he protested.


"Every three hours," she said, matter-of-factly.


"These conscientious injectors!" he muttered.


The nurse laughed, and while White Jack held his arm,
pressed down the plunger.


He looked her over with appreciation. She was well and
bountifully made in every area, and in addition had nice mediumblonde
hair and a warm smiling manner.


"<i>La Combinazione</i>" he pronounced.


"What's that mean?"


"It means that there is a combination of all good things."


She smiled and let the matter rest; as if she feared he might
enumerate her charms out loud. She left rather hastily, with
White Jack throwing him a backward glance, half-admiring,
half-menacing. A few minutes later he returned with Jason,
raised his bed on its sliding legs, and carried it out of the room,
into the corridor, and out on to a broad lawn. They set bim
down some fifty yards from the hut.


The sun dazzled him at first but he soon began to enjoy
being outside, although he still felt weak. He stared at the sky
for a long time before turning to look at his surroundings. He

[p. <i>115</i>]

His attention was caught by a swarm of fleas which danced
up and down near him. They came over to him and he, far
from ducking or evading them as he might once have done,
deliberately thrust his head among them, keeping his eyes open
acutely for observation. He saw that though they appeared at
a distance to be an undifferentiated black mass, they were really
in orderly groups and were spaced in symmetry. He could make
out separate squadrons, each with its own leader and sub-leader.
As a leader dropped or soared, so did the squadron, maintaining
the symmetrical distances. He attributed the arrow formation
he saw to the fact that one insect would naturally make his
flight easier by following wide of the air-stream created by the
insect in front. He felt himself to be so understanding of the
ways of nature that he thought he could easily estimate the
number of the apparently myriad swarm. He was computing in
the thousands when the swarm swept over him, forcing him to
shut his eyes, and he grew alarmed. He heard a laugh that
sounded like White Jack's, and was beginning to panic when
Jason and another orderly came and lifted his bed clear of the
insects. The new orderly, whom they called Hal, made some
little joke he couldn't hear, but his voice was friendly. Soon
recovering from his fright, he watched Hal walk slowly around
among the patients. Large and corpulent, he was the type of

[p. <i>116</i>]

Near to him a patient in blues stumbled by, quoting out
loud: "And the Lord said, If there are ten just men I will spare
the city ... And it was found that there were not ten, And he
said ..." He walked out of hearing, but his lips were still seen
to move.


He saw approaching him a tall, thin, distinguished-looking
man, in his forties, well dressed, probably a visitor.


Michael noticed he was very tall, and spoke with an agreeable
but eccentric pronunciation. There was a chair near the bed
and he brought it over and sat down. He explained that his
nephew, a lieutenant in the infantry, was a patient here, and
that he often came to see him. His name was Maynard and he
was a professor of literature at Cambridge. He came from Malta,
where his family had been for a hundred and fifty years.


It was a good cover story, and well delivered.


The professor mentioned that his nephew had been given a
medal for bravery at the front.


"How I admire that!" said Michael, forgetting his V.C., and
the other smoothed his moustache to hide his pleasure. "I mean
the action, of course," Michael added, "not just the medal. An
act of bravery is a work of art."


The attack of the insects came back into his mind and he
thought of the swarm of German planes attacking Britain. He
turned to the professor.


"Could I say a poem to you I wrote long ago? I have no
yet ..."


"I should be delighted."

[p. <i>117</i>]

Michael's heart beat fasterthis poetry writing was such a
desperate matter with him.


"It is a short poem, but I'd like to explain it first ... It's a
kind of prayer. Do you remember during the Battle of Britain
how one of our planes would go up to fight a dozen or more
enemy bombers? Perhaps you wouldn't see the enemy, but you
knew they were a few minutes away. So, standing there on the
ground, you heard one of our fighting planes in the air, and
you looked up and waved to the single man, fighting for all of
us, who might be dead in five minutes. My admiration for these
pilots was very great, and I tried to make up a prayer to be
said by those who waved them on. I called it From the Ground.
This is it." He spoke rather indistinctly, almost stuttering,
spacing the words.


He looked searchingly into the professor's eyes.


"Is that a good poem, or at least a good prayer?"


"I think it's both. I have felt like that and wanted to say it."

[p. <i>118</i>]

The religious young man in hospital blues knelt some paces
off and flung out his arms, indicating Michael, and declaimed:


"There is One that follows me, whereof I prophesy, and He,
I say to you, is so much mightier than I, that I am unworthy
to unlatch His shoes."


What next! Michael rolled his eyes up, and over at the
professor. He was gazing mildly past John the Baptist, and
smoking with don-like calm.


La Comba went to the young man, coaxed him into standing,
and led him away. The professor gave a faint smile. La Comba
came back to Michael and, despite his protests, for he was
revelling in the talk, had him borne aloft by two orderlies and
carried to his room.


Inside, he thought of the fleas, wondering if they, in their
trillions, were setting about the destruction of mankind. Yet
the fly was still guarding him from the lintel. It was a puzzle
to drive one mad.


It was night now, dark in the cell. Outside the closed door
he could sometimes hear the sister speak to an orderly, or hear
someone pass along the corridor. He knew what was happening.
He was thus oriented, as he had never been oriented on the
ship, with the ordinary, understandable world. But those outside
did not know about the world surrounding him, that at this
moment his room was filled world people of his childhood,
standing all about him in the darkness as silent spectres. Those
he trusted stood near him, his aunt seeming to smile at some
dry joke made by his father, and his grandmother seeming to
tell one of her stories, of which the last words always were:

[p. <i>119</i>]

The spirits exorcised, and alone, he thought once more, while
still half-awake, of the emperor stabbing the flies, and then of
the emperor who reigned just before or after him. On the day
when he was dying of fever slaves carried him to a farm in his
litter. He pushed open the curtains and looked up at the sky
(which was now the sky of England) and it was so intensely
blue he wept with rage that he had to leave the world.


The next morning when the medical colonel came round, he
had with him another doctor. Michael looked at him and gave
a shrill laugh. It was a marvellous comic impersonation of James
Thurber.


"Very good," Michael said, between laughs, "very good
those glasses!" The glasses were extremely well done and gave
the doctor the same Thurber appearance of peeking through
twin keyholes.


The doctor smiled weakly, and said in a humorous voice
(perhaps he <i>was</i> Thurber, dressed up), "I'm happy to amuse
you, Mr. Gill."

[p. <i>120</i>]

"Oh, call me Michael," he answered, "as brother officers do."


"Of course, Michael, how are you feeling?"


They talked some medical talk, and he couldn't make out if
James Thurber was a surgeon, a physician, or a psychiatrist. It
was enough that he could play such a joke.


The doctor took off a bandage altogether from a healed
wound on his arm, and when they had gone he was bemused
by the beauty of the scar. It was a reddish-purple colour, and
wonderfully shapedsomething like a butterfly, though you
could say also it was like a star, or many things in nature. He
called it a scarflower and made up a poem in its honour.


"O scar ..." he said.


People kept passing his door and he was glad he knew so
many of them. That calm prepossessing man was Major Stewart,
with Pop, the senior orderly; and that was the religious young
man, who now referred to him merely as Saint Michael; and
just now, those two patients in blue shepherded by a new nurse
he called Miss Bentbow were friends of his. The shorter one
was a sailor he called the Submarine Kid because he was hagridden
by some terrible accident in a submarine. The tall, rangy
one's name was actually Knockwood, whose only madness, if
madness it wereopinion was divided on thiswas that he had
no repressions. If Sergeant Knockwood fancied a watch or a
pen he put it in his pocket, and if he wanted to pinch a behind,
Sergeant Knockwood pinched it. Which was no doubt why

[p. <i>121</i>]

The hospital was different from the ship in that he knew and
trusted so many people around himnearly everyone but White
Jackbut the passing of time was the same. Without a watch
he could only guess the time of day, he did not know the day
of the week, and was not even sure of the month. He was not
aware of gaps between events, and awake or asleep lived in a
state of heightened response and perception. In fact, all time
was eventfulto see a new person, to dream, to fancy, to
remember, even to be shaved. Sometimes he thought of his
happy days at camp when he was a boy, walking in the Minden
woods, and diving into the smooth blue lake; and sometimes,
of his mother's military ancestors, who had fought in every
great battle since Hastings; and without self-irony, he thought
that he would emulate them, emulate those fantastic spirits of
the Renaissance, who strove "to get their hands upon the gear
of the world," or emulate the young ensign who led the flotilla
round the defences of Quebec, or that young captain, with Sir
John Moore in the Peninsula, who rode into battle at Scoa, his
Spanish mistress, like a goddess, running by his side. He was
like a wanderer lost in a magic wood, encountering strange
adventures, lying down as often in terror as waking in joy to
a marvel.


His friend the masseur dropped in, as people did all the time,
but could stay only a minute, to show him snapshots of his girl.
She was dark and passionate-looking, like a gypsy, standing in

[p. <i>122</i>]

Once he had met Ruth in such a place. The day sparkled
under a deep blue sky, the scent of the earth branched in his
blood, and Ruth was so beautiful he could hardly look at her.
In all your life the times as perfect as this would be only twice,
or once. They walked along a narrow path between wild flowers
 mostly daisies, and blue flowersswaying against her waist
as she went. The present time was so powerful it obliterated
the ugly future. They walked slowly, hand in hand, in the
prelude of love, and he tried to make the prelude stay. It was
strange that when you remembered a woman you had loved,
you did not think of her body, but of how you walked beside
her once in trust and love. He tried not to hear the tones of her
voice, or see the tanned skin of her arms, or feel her thigh against
his hand; he wanted to walk an age beside the Ganges and stave
off time. Ruth understood, and their thousand years beside the
Ganges was at least a quarter of an hour, when their hands
tightened, and down they fell, like lion cubs.


A stranger passed the door, a tall man with yellowish hair,
and at once Michael felt a fierce dislike for him. He raked him
from head to foot with a glare of hatred. The man showed
instant fear, and cringed as if under a real blow, and staggered
out of sight. This had happened before, and the contrary also:
when passers-by out of curiosity had glanced in at him, in
moments when he was afraid, they had shown a brutal triumph.
He would test these reactions deliberately.


As an unknown patient looked in, Michael simulated a fierce,
cruel expression, and it was as he had expected: the man shrank
with fear, even raising his hands to cover his face. In a moment,
another man passed, and Michael put on a look of abject fear,
and cowered back in the bed. At once there came on this man's
face a bestial exultation.

[p. <i>123</i>]

"How hateful mankind is!" he said aloud. "What jungle
creatures they are."


Miss Bentbow came in, cool and starchy.


"What is it?" she asked.


"When I look afraid, they become ugly with cruelty, and
when I look brave, they cringe with fear."


"Well, look brave then," she said and returned to her desk.


The next morning, "That radio down the hall," Michael
began.


"Yes?" Colonel Calder answered, in a hurry, but interested
to hear this.


"It never stops. And somebody tells a joke, which I can't
hear, and there's a burst of idiot laughter in the studio, and
everybody claps. Then the music goes on and on, and there's
no escape. And some of the things they play over and over
begin to get inside your head, and you can't help humming
them inside, even when you hate them. But the idiot laughter
off is the worst."


He said all this in a fast emphatic way.


"I agree with you, Gill. I'll see what can be done. But most
patients like to hear any kind of noise."


"And Colonel ..." he said, struggling to express what he
thought he had told them a thousand times.


"What?"


"I'm a prisoner ... I haven't seen anyone ... the ship ...
I ..."

[p. <i>124</i>]

"But your foot's broken. It takes time to get well. You must
be patient."


He passed on quickly before Michael could answer.


He wondered at the soldier in the room opposite, where the
door was always locked. He often heard him shouting and
swearing, and once saw him look out at the grill. He had a
defiant expression on his dark handsome face and didn't care
what he said to the orderlies.


Now he was making a terrible racket, and appeared again at
the grill. He had not been shaved for several days, and his
beard, together with his thick hair hanging over one side of
his forehead, gave him a ferocious appearance. He was like a
caged leopard. He spat into the corridor, and then went away.
He could be heard smashing and rattling whatever was inside
the room.


Michael saw Hal go up nervously to the grill and peer in.
He looked like a man steeling himself to do what frightened
him. Then he deftly opened the door bolt and gave a signal to
someone out of sight. The tension in the air was almost palpable.
There was a sound of boots on stone, and three orderlies careened
through the door as Hal opened it. Smash, crash, thud, a few
shouts, and all was quiet. White Jack, a look of shame and
relief on his sweating face, came out with the others and glanced
in at him. His face seemed to say: "See what we do when we
have the chance?"


A quick fear came over him, with all its physical elements
an empty, loose feeling in the stomach, the genitals going cold
the scalp breaking out in sweat. But he quickly recovered: he

[p. <i>125</i>]

Later in the morning he told the Submarine Kid what had
taken place, and the Kid said that the man they had attacked
had come from the military prison. And he'd been sent there
for striking his C.O. Many of the men, he added, had gone to
prison for military crimes, and there, the guards had driven
them to blow their tops.


On the inside cover of a book he began to draw. Without
having a formulated conception of what he was trying to do,
there evidently was an inner conception, and very definite
intention, for compulsively, he found himself drawing a warrior.
He was a man of ideal fighting physique: tall, strong, deepchested.
He became clothed in modern armour, and it hung
lighdy upon him. Then he outfitted him with an arsenal of
ancient weapons: broadsword, rapier, dagger, spear, bow and
arrows. It was an Occidental <i>Samurai</i>. Despite a primitive
crudeness, for he had, ordinarily, no drawing skill, the sketch
was powerful in conveying the intention of a man completely
master in defence and aggression.


Outside on the lawn, his attention was caught by a man lying
motionless at the trunk of a tree. He had never seen a man lie
so still, except the dead Italian at Pontecorvo.


"Hal," he called softly, "I think that man's dead."


Hal scoffed at first, then was prevailed on to go and look.
He barrelled over and bent down to the man's face, watching
him intently, then came back.

[p. <i>126</i>]

"He's breathing all right," he told Michael confidentially,
"he's what is called a catatonic, that's the next thing to bein'
deadbut he's all right."


From a small group of visitors on the lawn, Professor
Maynard emerged. He came up to the bed and without any
preamble began to question him.


"I want your opinion," he said, "about one of the situations
that have come about in this war. Imagine that you are a loyal
Frenchman but believe you can be more useful to the resistance
by posing as a collaborator. Accordingly, you entertain the
enemy and your own quislings in your Paris flat, while all the
time you are working with the Maquis and the English."


"You know of such a man?"


"Yes," the professor answered, with emphasis, "we do." He
seemed to speak as if he were connected with intelligence work.


He went on: "What I want to know is, how do you think a
man would stand up to such a life? Remember, he is thoroughly
hated and despised by the majority of Frenchmen, who don't
realise he's on their side. The enemy despise him, and every
moment he's in deadly danger. You can imagine what the
Gestapo would do to him. Well, now, how would that affect
him, do you think? The danger, the hate, and the necessity to
be acting a lie every hour of the day?"


Michael thought before he answered, much interested in the
situation and surprised at the way the Professor was asking him
about it, as if what he said would be considered in some decision
elsewhere about the man's predicament.


"Well," he said, "the pressure and strain would be almost
intolerable to an ordinary man, but I suppose he isn't ordinary,
and probably takes pleasure in the outwitting of everyone, and
in the danger itself."


"Yes?"

[p. <i>127</i>]

"But even so, hasn't everyone a breaking point?"


"Ah! I'm interested to hear what you think, you think he
must crack eventually?"


"Without relief, I am practically certain he will."


"Quite," the professor nodded his head and rubbed his
moustache with a bent forefinger. He added, as if to himself,
"Question is how long it is safe to leave a man in that spot,"
then he changed the subject abruptly.


Michael did not ask why he should be interested in his viewpoint;
things like this, unexplained, never explained, he had
come to expect. The professor seemed satisfied with his answers
and sat musing over the problem. When he went away Michael
asked him to leave his newspaper.


The paper was one of the literate London dailies. He glanced
over the familiar pages till his eye was drawn to a headline:


BRITISH SOLDIER BRUTALLY TREATED.


A report has been received by military intelligence in the
Mediterranean area of the brutal treatment inflicted recently
upon a British prisoner of war by Bulgarian medical
personnel.


The prisoner, Pte. Stander C.P., of theLight Infantry,
was captured, in a severely-wounded condition, by a detachment
of the Bulgarian infantry in Greece. He was taken to
a rear hospital and there endured without benefit of
anaesthetic the amputation of his left leg. When he cried
out with the intolerable pain, a soldier standing nearby
struck him in the head with a rifle butt. Pte. Stander, now
back in safe hands, has made a complaint of this incident
to the...


Imagine! To saw off a man's leg while he was conscious.

[p. <i>128</i>]

He stopped, thinking that once you were deep enough in
evil the enormity of it absorbed your motive, and between the
avenger and the evil-doer there was no difference; perhaps these
men were, in some sense, avengers too. In his imagination he
immersed his head in the high grasses at the edge of the lawn.
He imagined the juice of them washing out his mind.


Once again he longed to be in a tent pitched out here, or in
his bedroll, underneath the skyalone, without men and
women, and their vileness. A poem evolved itself on the victims
of dreadful cruelty. He called out its phrases. His voice sobbed
in such accents that the orderlies sent to carry him in stood
unable to interrupt him.

[p. <i>129</i>]

In the late evening of that day he was given insulin. Miss
Bentbow made the injection with care, and the orderlies followed
her instructions with unusual gravity.


He didn't know just when he went to sleep. He was back on
board the ship. The fan was whirring and rotating like a large
mechanical eye, water swished in the vertical pipes, a gramophone
played the same record over and over again. He was
horribly sick and miserable. His bed swayed up and down. His
head lay flat, without a pillow... An orderly came into the
doorway, signalled, and stepped aside. A wedge of men flew

[p. <i>130</i>]

His eyes opened, he knew he was in hospital, he saw the
light-filled floor. In a convulsion he swayed towards it, then
galvanically jerked back his head and smashed it into die concrete
wall. He felt no pain there, all the pain was in his foot, which
needled him maddeningly. La Comba came in and her surged
towards her. She was a person, a woman. He needed a human
being to see, to speak to, to touch.


"Comba," he cried, and reached his arms around her hips,
"Oh, Comba!"


"There, Saint, there," she comforted him. "Now wake up,
wake up. It's all right." She gently, firmly lifted him back
against the pillows.


He saw Hal come in with a huge bowl of cereal and pot of
honey. He realized he was mad with hunger. He ate up the
enormous bowlful as if it were a scrap, and they filled it again.


"That's not honey," he finally said to Scotty.


"No, it's glucose, a sorta sugar."


"Christ, Hal, where I was!"


"Where were you?"


"Back on the boat. I went through it all again. The five men
rushed me and beat me up."

[p. <i>131</i>]

Hal shook his head, and said with rough acknowledgment.


"Aye, you've had a real goin' over somewhere along the line
... here's a fag."


"Oh, thanks."


He got a light, held in Hal's freckled hands, and puffed hard,
hard on the cigarette. When Hal left he felt a desperate need
for people, and kept watching the door for someone to pass.
He saw a plain, simple person, whom he usually thought
uninteresting, and called him. This patient came in as he was
bid, and sat on the chair near the bed.


"It's a nice day!" Michael told him.


"Oh, yes, I think it is."


"How wonderful the day is! That sunlight, and the smell of
the fresh air!"


"Sure, it's O.K."


He was greatly comforted just to have him sit there... He
saw someone familiar pass in the corridor.


"That's my father," he called out in excitement. The man
grinned as he passed.


The patient beside Michael asked in a voice of astonishment:


"Is Major Nicoll your father?"


"No, but that man was."


"That was Major Nicoll."


"Oh," Michael shook his head. "I, I am confused."


The patient went away then, seeing him occupied with his
own thoughts.


Already he had forgotten that he had a moment ago mistaken
a doctor for his fatherhis thoughts were on something quite
different. By some odd chance there was good music coming
from the radio in the ward. He thought it was ballet music. He
looked down woefully at his foot, and said aloud:


"That foot. You couldn't dance with it."

[p. <i>132</i>]

You couldn't make that great leap of the Rose, which required
four men standing below to catch him. If he had had several
lives he should have wanted one of them to be the life of a
dancer, classical or popular, or both. As the latter he would
come on the stage, with the orchestra playing what they wished,
and let a mood grow up between himself and the audience, then
create a dance they both desired. He would sing, dance, crack
jokes, alter lights and sets, and then take himself and partners;
and company on the wings of extravaganza into some delightful
beautiful, comic, or terrible dance.


And as a classical dancer, he would lead ballet out of formalism
into a similar world of creativity. There would be no classical
leaps, arabesques and <i>entrechats</i>. All would be invented new.
The aim would be to gain altitude, to twirl, soar, run, dive,
slide. How to do it would be the personal invention of every
dancer. Let him mark and achieve the grace of a pole vaulter
or high diver. A ballet master would not teach how, but what
... What a genius mat Nimzovitch was! A new type of human,
with dancers' feet, who believed that dancing could be a separate
art, with music equal or subordinate. An absolute art of ideas
and emotions, and infinite in forms of expression.


A man came in: a modest, well-seeming man, in officer's
uniform and stood silently staring.


"Poor Nimzovitch," Michael was saying, "that great artist
he thinks he's a horse."


After a pause, a voice outside said, "Nimzovitch? He means
Niiinsky."


"Of course, Niiinsky, and I said poor; but it is only poor
Niiinsky, because he isn't really a horse. Sometimes he must
know he isn't and that he is only a demented dancer. What
could be more superb than to be a mighty horse? To have that
power and beauty. Of course, an animal may not be aware of

[p. <i>133</i>]

The man who stood inside his room gave Michael a grave
but friendly smile.


Michael said: "I haven't met you. I'm Gill."


The man came over and shook hands: "Palmer," he said,
but added, "I think."


Michael looked a question at him.


"I don't remember anything, but they tell me my name is
Palmer. That's all I know, except that I'm in the Dental Corps."


"I'm in the Mental Corps, myself," Michael answered,
"formerly anti-tank."


Palmer smiled.


"That's way up front, isn't it?"


"Yes, it's the nearest unit to the enemy, you mustn't snore
at night."


Jason came in to shave him, and Palmer moved away.


"We must talk again," Michael called to him.


"Thanks, I would like to."


In the evening he saw an orderly he had noticed recently,
going along the corridor. He called him and when he was
sitting opposite saw he was very thin and had protruding teeth
his expression was agreeably comic.

[p. <i>134</i>]

"I was wondering," Michael said, "I saw you the other night
with three other orderlies, and you were all carrying a guy in
a blanketwhat was all that?"


"C-c-cold bath," the orderly replied, "obstreperous patient."


Michael shook his head with misgiving.


"What else do they do around here?"


"Straight jacket sometimes. What do you mean, c-c-cures,
too?"


"Yes."


"Well, there's insulin ..."


"Don't I know it!"


"An' there's electric shock."


"Christ!" said Michael, thinking of it. "That's grim, eh?"


"Oh, I dunno. It shocks hell out of them, but they don't
remember a thing after."


"I hope they don't, I pray they don't," he murmured. The
mere thought of the electric treatment sent a cold wave into
his groin.


"Look at that!" the orderly said, pointing to the corridor.


"What?"


"Don't you see, <i>that?</i>" And Michael saw he meant two yellow
eyes shining in the darkness.


"A cat. Must have sneaked in," Michael said. "You don't say
the word, do you?"


"I c-c-c-an't."


"Why do cats bother you?"


"They make me sneeze. Besides, their bloody c-c-c-caterwauling
at night when I was a k-k-kid scared hell out of me."


<table>
<row>
<cell>
"Say A."
</cell>
<cell>
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"A."
</cell>
<cell>
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"B."
</cell>
<cell>
"B."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"C."
</cell>
<cell>
"C."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"K."
</cell>
<cell>
"K-k-k-kay."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"A."
</cell>
<cell>
"A."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"F."
</cell>
<cell>
"F."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"R."
</cell>
<cell>
"R."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"K."
</cell>
<cell>
"K."
</cell>
</row>
</table>

[p. <i>135</i>]

"There you are: when you don't expect a k sound you say
it all right. Try some more words now:


<table>
<row>
<cell>
"At bat cat."
</cell>
<cell>
"At bat c-c-cat."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"Freight."
</cell>
<cell>
"Freight."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"Fat."
</cell>
<cell>
"Fat."
</cell>
</row>
<row>
<cell>
"Cat."
</cell>
<cell>
"Cat."
</cell>
</row>
</table>


"Hooray!" Michael exulted. "God damn it, as I'm sitting here,
you said cat."


"Yes, I sure did," the orderly said, and smiled happily.


"Take up your head and talk."


"I will, Saint, thanks a million."


After he had gone, something he had noticed about the
orderly remained in his mind and gave him a happy feeling and
a sense of coming back into his environment that was deeper
than that assurance he had received from hearing Canadian
voices and expressions. On the orderly's feet was a pair of
running shoes. They were old ones, that perhaps his older
brother wore. At the ankles were reinforcing patches and there
was a strip of rubber over the toecap, and the eyelets were also
reinforced with rings. Those shoes meant his boyhood in the
city and at camp. Merely glancing at them he remembered lacing
on his own pairso impatiently!to go and meet the gang
on the next street. Those shoes had been so sure on his feet he
could climb over the roof of the haunted house and walk along
the rail of the bridgeit was astonishing what you would do
then200 feet above the ground. In those shoes he had jumped
with his friends from stone to stone in the ravine and raced

[p. <i>136</i>]

The turmoil of the leaves subsided as the wind diedall lay
still. All was as still as it would be at the end of the world.
Before him was empty landscape, and there was not so much as
a stone fragment to show that man had ever scarred the earth.
It was the time of Nothing. In the beginning was the word; at
the end was another word, and the word was ... A feeling of
bliss and certainty suffused him. He would be given the name
that was the reason for everything. Here it was, inside his brain,
the magic symbol. In broken letters it trembled thereCICATRIX.


He woke, his eyes still closed, and fumbled for the pencil on
the table. By the cup his ringers found it. He wrote in large
letters on the paper napkin.


In a moment a patient in blues passed the door.


"Come in, come in," Michael implored him.


The patient came in nervously.


Michael showed him what he'd written.


"Look! Look! he cried, "That's the magic word, it explains
the meaning of existence. I tell it to you. Read itCICATRIX!"


The man in blue looked uneasily at the word, and then
wonderingly at him. But Michael scarcely noticed him. In a
tone of exultation he repeated it over and over 


"Cicatrix! Cicatrix! Cicatrix!"


With almost the same hunger his body wanted sugar, his

[p. <i>137</i>]

A man in blues came to his bedside and talked to him. What
did he know of Mozart's works: had he heard this sonata and
that concerto? As he talked he flashed a piece of looking-glass
across the lawn and when he succeeded in playing it in the face
of some dignified visitor, causing annoyance and bewilderment,
laughed with infectious, childish glee.


Did Michael know the Quintet? he asked. Never mind, he
would feel the same way if he heard it. When you played the
Quintet you recreated a world as marvellous as the one around
you, the only difference was that you heard instead of saw it.


"Like this grass?" Michael asked, leaning over to the ground.


"Yes!" The musician knelt down on the ground and separated
the blades of a tuft of grass.


Michael peered into the sheaf of uncountable spears, thrusting
in all directions: this was much more wonderful than the grass
he remembered. A thought struck him.


"You must be one of the poets who once lived in the old

[p. <i>138</i>]

"No," the other laughed, "I'm not that kind of a poet, I'm
a clarinet player."


Miss Ruthven fluttered near them, dark, and tremulous with
apprehension, "Mr. Gill, do be careful, you'll fall out of bed.
Do, do be careful!" She pushed him gently back against the
pillows. "Malin," she said, turning to speak to the musician,
but he had wandered away, shining his glass as he went, and
lifting his head up in laughter. Miss Ruthven hurried after him.


Michael had been greatly impressed by Mozart's Quintet and
promised himself he would hear it when he escaped from there.


The sun began to sink, and though the day was not less
beautiful, indeed it was more beautiful, he knew he was no
longer in another world, but in the old world, in which you
wanted what you never got. He wished Hobby were with him
to watch the sun go down. If only, only Hobby were there.
That she was not there, and that the sunset was disappearing
seemed to him the same thing. But he must not let it go without
saying what it was. The sun was now a dark-red ball and
seemed to be drowning in what was a sea of the most vivid
blue. At the corner of his eye he saw a great black-ribbed cloud,
the shape of a wing, and with edges feathered by the wind,
drifting towards the drowning of the sun. The blue sea was
what you wanted, the red ball was both your desire and sorrow,
and it was sinking, and being lost, and dying in what it wanted.
The black cloud was the emblem of energy and universal life,
a blind black energy of supreme power which flew across to
obliterate sun and sky. That was what he saw before him, but
he could not say it in a poem. Perhaps when he first came out
he could have done it, for perhaps poets lived in the world he
had lived in for only an hour. That drowning blaze of blood

[p. <i>139</i>]

In the evening a young brutish orderly sat on the end of
the bed.


"What did you do in Civvy Street?" Michael asked him.


"Crazy bin, same as this. On'y the guys in there had syph.
It ain't very nice what syph can do to a guy. Ever see a guy
paralyzed with syph?"


Michael shook his head.


"It ain't very nice," the orderly said, "And do you know
why he's paralyzed? Because those little spirokeeters have got
into his brain. About a billion of them."


"What did you do before that?"


"I was in a works where they made blocks of metal. I sat
by the assembly belt, an' when the hot brick come by I turned
it over with tongs."


He snatched at a lady-bug on the wall and seemed to have
caught it, for he kept his fist closed.


"At night when I went to sleep, steada seein' sheep I saw
white-hot bricks goin' by, an' they'd never stop coming."


He squeezed his fist gently, and then opened it, revealing to
Michael's eyes the bug. Its wings were quivering but it could
not rise. The orderly popped it into his mouth.


"That's why I liked it better being with looneys. You know
what? Them guys is very interesting." He chewed the small
morsel.


"I useta like watching' emthe queer things they'd do. There

[p. <i>140</i>]

"What would he say?"


"Brainy stuff. Long words, aw! pitchers, opra, stuff like that
... Nix! there's Hal, better scram back on dooty."


He swung his leg over the bed rail, and slipped out quietly
into the corridor.


Somebody had said that there were Italian families riddled
with syphilis: that it went on from generation to generation,
contracted or inherited from the mother, that a tolerance was
built up against it, as in some parts of the world people withstood
transmitted malaria. Thus, a man with syphilis doctored
it in some inadequate way, and fornicated and married without
restraint.


He called out:


"Perhaps I have the hereditary Italian syphilis."


There was a hush in the corridor as he said these words, and
he felt that the nurses and the orderlies were listening, tense
with curiosity.


A familiar sound woke him. The sound of guns. Then the
sound of shells. It was dark in the room. He guessed the time
at about three o'clock. In between the firing and falling all was
quiet. If a shell landed on the hut he would be thrown against

[p. <i>141</i>]

Hal went by, carrying a kerosene lamp.


"Hal."


"Aye."


"What is it?"


From fear they were whispering. Hal came in, holding the
lamp high. He tried to conceal his fear, but it was obvious, and
his whispered words trembled. He said:


"The Gerries are shelling us from Calais, and we're shelling
them from Dover."


"But those shells are coming god-damned close?"


"Aye, they are."


"I'd hate to be those poor bastards in Dover." He prayed
for them in Dover, shutting his eyes and saying to himself 
"Let them be all right." Bombing was bad enough, but it was
relatively haphazard, whereas shelling was really terrible. Once

[p. <i>142</i>]

"What are you going to do if the hut is hit, Hal?"


Hal spoke now like a human being, not like an orderly in
charge of a patient.


"I don't know."


"You'll have to figure how to evacuate the patients ... put
me in charge, Hal, I'll work out what to do."


"All right, Saint."


"First you should get all the orderlies up and assign them
to different sectionsmake each pair responsible for taking out
so many beds. In case there's fire, you should have someone
manning the equipment ... You'd better tell the patients that
we have a plan to get them out. You don't want them panicking,
and the up-patients running round in a frenzy."


There was a noise in the corridor, and Hal went out in that
rapid way the orderlies had when they thought a patient was
going to make trouble. But it wasn't a patient.


"Yes, sir," Hal was saying, and the voice of Major Blain
could be heard, giving him orders.


Michael didn't see him again that night, and lay for a long
time in anxiety as the guns boomed at Dover, and as shells
seemed to drop very near. He thought of the people in cellars,
trying to keep their courage up, and of bloody bits of flesh and
clothes hitting into walls.


Again in the morning there was that desperate longing for
food, and again he had a kind of convulsion, trying this time
to hurl himself on the floor. It seemed that only by such a violent
action could he escape from his physical desperation. He ate,
with the same ravenous hunger, the enormous cereal with its
lavish covering of glucose. Then he was given large coloured

[p. <i>143</i>]

When Colonel Calder came in he tried to keep him talking,
saying he could explain all about his case, and then they would
know exactly how to deal with him. He wanted to tell him of
the heat at Caserta hospital, of the drugs and the pain, then of
the beating on the ship, of ... But Colonel Calder said: "We
know all about you: you must find out about us," and as
Michael tried, open-mouthed, to say something to detain him,
vanished down the corridor.


There it was, piercing, piercing, but never quite going
through. A sharp, pointed ice-pick that was forever pricking
into the bone. It was terrible, this pain, maddening, using up
all his strength, and yet, when it faded sometimes and gave him
that marvellous peace which comes on the cessation of pain,
after a while he almost wished it to return, because it was a
terrible stimulation he was used to, and because it challenged
him, and in its absence he believed he could stand it, and
conquer it. He liked to conceal his suffering; he prided himself
he could talk quite normally, for a while at least, as that maddening
pick delved into the bone and set his nerves burning. But
he must have tablets to helpcodeine, or whatever they were
he knew he could not possibly stand the pain without relief,
he was just able to endure the remnants of pain between them.
He believed he could walk about with this companion provided

[p. <i>144</i>]

He saw White Jack going by and asked him to get him paper
and pencil. White Jack was most civil and obliging in doing
this, and hovered about the room as Michael placed the sheet
on a paper-backed book<i>Six Feet of Dynamite</i>and began to
write.


"Letting your folks know how you are?" White Jack asked.


"No, not yet. I'll wait till I'm well. This is just a business
letterto the bank."


"Very good idea. Get your back pay."


"That's it."


"Say," said White Jack, "I happened to notice you got a
pound to your name in the nurse's office ..."


Michael was trying to think what to say in his letter. "Oh,"
he answered.


"Yeah. I thought you'd like to knowcome in handy."


"Ye-es," he replied, not really hearing him.


"Like a cigarette?"


"Thanks, I would."


"Light for you."


"Fine."


"Well," White Jack concluded, "anything you want, just you
give me a shout. I'll be around."


"O.K."


White Jack, still smiling genially, went out of the door.


It was very hard to concentrate, but with extreme care and
patience he wrote a formal military letter to the commanding
officer of the hospital, asking, as his right, permission to see
him. He concealed the letter inside his jacket. Then he wrote

[p. <i>145</i>]

"Dear Sir, Please send me my money." White Jack was very
obliging in finding an envelope, sealing it, and promising to
mail it.


An hour passed outside. Everyone now: patients, nurses,
doctors, visitors had gone in, and he was alone in the middle
of the lawn. Around him on the edge were the hospital huts
and the residences. Planes going to and from the aerodrome
swooped low over him. At first they interested, then irritated,
then frightened him, as the fleas had done. He was alone, but
he knew there were people listening: it was almost as if they
were giving him the chance he needed.


With a great effort of will he got out the letter addressed in
pencil to the colonel, and prepared himself to speak. He held
it up so it could be seen. Then, in a clear, loud, sombre voice
he said:


"I am Michael Gill, Lieutenant, R.C.A., in the First Canadian
Division. Wounded at Pontecorvo, when my troop supported
the advance of the Third Brigade. I was at Caserta hospital and
then was brought here to England by hospital ship. I have told
you how I was attacked on that ship. It is my right to see the
Commanding Officer of this hospital. I have asked repeatedly
to see him. I have a letter here formally requesting to see him.
I must give warning that if I do not see the C.O. within twenty-four
hours I will inform higher command at Canada House. I
have means of getting a letter out of this hospital."


At a distant edge of the lawn he saw the calm figure of Major
Stewart coming slowly towards him. Michael waited in silence.

[p. <i>146</i>]

Michael called out: "I give this letter for the Commanding
Officer into the hands of Major Stewart, I know he will give it
to the colonel."


The major smiled gravely at this, took the letter, and carried
it away. With detachment, Michael was able to admire his
tactful conducthe was handling the situation perfectly.


When Major Stewart had returned indoors with the letter,
White Jack and Jason came out to carry Michael's bed back to
the ward. They offered him a cigarette, and White Jack, especially,
was as kind and helpful as he had been during the previous
two days. The bed had extending legs, and these, through
some mistake, came shooting out when the bed was raised, and
caught fast. This caused the orderlies to stumble, giving him a
jar in his foot. He spoke angrily to them. They decided it would
be easier to adjust the legs in the room, and continued to carry
him with the bed as it was. Thus, when they let him down
inside, he found himself high up in the room, looking down at
them, rather like a man on a horse.


White Jack was still affable, though less convincingly so than
before. He made what he thought was a casual reference to the
pound in the office, but by now Michael understood the motive
for his kindness, and looked at him with scorn. White Jack
went to one of the front legs to adjust it, and brought the bed
down slowly on that side. Then he brought the other end down,
but the leg slipped as he did so, and Michael received another
painful jar. He snapped out:


"For God's sake, be careful!"


White Jack straightened up with a look of fury, and then
jerked his head questioningly to Jason. For many seconds they

[p. <i>147</i>]

For some time he lay on a slope, the head of the bed still
high up, for neither of the two dared expose the back of his
neck to him, as he must to lower the legs. It was eventually
Hal who did so; having no reason to fear him. Michael was too
angry to be afraid. He knew he had beaten them.


He took off his pyjama jacket, and contemplated the new
strength of his body. He admired the rippling muscles of his
arms and the rounded flesh of his chest. Had his physique really
been like this before?


A good-looking Red Cross girl called "Hello," and walked
in. He knew at once by the way she looked at him that his
body was real.


Late in the evening there was a commotion in the corridor,
and two orderlies could be seen tugging and pushing a shambling,
dejected giant. They opened the door of the now empty room
opposite, pushed him inside, and locked the door.


After a while there was the sound of smashing and breaking,
and then of glass shattering.


At once there was tension, half a dozen orderlies raced
towards the room, lights were switched on. Nurses gave orders,
and Major Blain stepped uncertainly to the door.


"You'll have to go in," he said, "he may use the glass on
his wrists."


Someone turned the lock, and then stepped back hurriedly
as the giant loomed up tremendous on the threshold.

[p. <i>148</i>]

Michael thought: They don't want to use their flying wedge
with the doctor there, or maybe they don't dare. The man was
really tremendous. He was no longer dejected, he stood at full
height, with two ham-like hands held up to strangle or hit. He
was not much over twenty years old, with blonde hair and a
Scottish face with lantern jaw.


"If you come an inch closer, I'll stove your bloody heads
in," he shouted.


Major Blain, afraid but brave, told him to go back in the
room. The giant dwarfed the doctor, who himself was a big man.


"Let me out of here," he warned, and the orderlies crowding
him on both sides shrank back against the wall.


"Kid," Michael called, in a quiet voice, rather gloomy, "come
in here." He knew the state of his mind, which divined the
treacherousness of the orderlies, and recognised Michael as his
ally.


The gigantic youth at once walked in.


"Sit down and talk to me."


The youth just stood there.


"You don't need to fight me," Michael said, pointing to his
cast. "Sit down."


Now he sat down.


"You should thank me," Michael went on. "That was a major
you were talking to out there, and if you'd hit him you would
have been in here a long time."


The young man looked alarmed.


"Was I going to strike an officer?" he asked, in confusion.


"It looked like it, but, anyway, you didn't, so don't worry
about it. Now, tell me what's wrong. Why did you blow your
cork like that?"


The giant leaned forward, his hands in his hair, and his
elbows high up to shut out the light.

[p. <i>149</i>]

"I'm crazy worried for my wife. I was at the front, see, and
I got a letter she was going to have a baby. It was an old date
on it, and I knew it would be the next day, and I thought of
her all alone, and the pain, and I wouldn't be there; so I just
started running and running, to get to her through the night,
and the next thing, I dunno what happened ... I'm in a goddamned
room and I break the window trying to get to her ..."


"Listen, I know you want to help your wifethat's the vital
thing with you, isn't it?"


"Help her?" he asked, confused.


"Yes, you want her to be calm in her mindnot be upset
so she can have the baby without trouble?"


"Sure, sure, that's why I gotta be near her."


"There's something you've got to understandlistenyou're
in a state of battle shock. You were too long in action, maybe.
If you see your wife now you'll worry the life out of her. So
the best thing for your wife is to be alone. The hospital will
take perfect care of her. Thousands of women have babies every
day, every hour. Do you think they have to have soldiers
charging in and out...?"


He gave a half-ashamed smile.


"No, I guess not."


"The first thing you have to do is get well. Then they'll let
you see her, and the baby too. Look, why don't you ask the
major to find out how your wife is? He can do that for you."


"Yeah, that'd be good."


White Jack and Scotty came to the door.


"Come on, kid, you need some sleep now," said White Jack.
He seemed to think the word kid had magical powers.


Obediently the giant rose to his feet and stumbled across
into his room. A gang of orderlies followed after. There was a
scuffling heard, then all was still.

[p. <i>150</i>]

Maybe they gave him the needle. Maybe they hurt him!


Michael did his best to have Hal speak to the major about
getting news of the wife. Hal promised he would.


Michael picked up a large American picture magazine. He
saw it in a special way, as if he were slightly drunk. He wondered
at the creamy, smooth paper, the many startling advertisements
in colour, the varied print, and the excellent dramatic photographs.
He took some interest in the war pictures, though he
did not especially associate himself with themthe British in
Greece, and the Americans in the Pacific seemed rather remote
from his anti-tank war in Italy. But there was a combat picture
of men lying exhausted by a road, after a long march, during
which they had been harassed by the enemy, which he did find
more interesting. It was most curious to him, the vulnerable
postures they had fallen into. Some had removed their helmets,
others lay on their backs with their stomachs and genitals unguarded,
and others lay face down, exposing their spines and
necks to flying shot. It was hard to understand. He leafed through
the pages, ignoring articles on politics and pictures of politicians.
He enjoyed looking at a movie actress packaged in a bathing
suit, but thought the excessive neatness of her wrapping de-sexed
her. A painting by a Flemish master of Christ tormented
was altogether too terrible for him to glance at more than a
second. Then, at the beginning of the magazine he saw a really
remarkable photograph.


It was of a boy, perhaps seven or eight years old, looking
with surprise and some alarm at the camera. He was French, he
read below, a war orphan, and was with a group of displaced
persons. The others, wretched and fear-stricken, were a background
to him; he was in the centre forefront of the picture,
caught in surprise and fear, as few artists could have thought
to pose him. He was dressed well, though his clothes were dusty,

[p. <i>151</i>]

"I will adopt this child. He shall be my son!"


Now he was Christ, drawing in, sufficing in the piercing,
interminable agonies of the Crucifixion. He was first Christ,
then a bystander looking at the turban of dark black hair and
the overcrowding rings of black thorns piercing his head. He
woke up with a shriek in the blackness of his cell.


With his head splitting and nerves ajangle he woke again and
had a convulsion. When he came out of it he felt he could not
stand the treatment any longer.


Miss Bentbow entered, crisp and fresh; he looked at her with
pain-filled eyes, and muttered, in weak anger:


"What are they trying to do to me ... torture? ..."


She surveyed him with professional interest, and then said,
in cool accents:

[p. <i>152</i>]

"Yes, I think you've had enough."


He looked up at the good-looking face and fine-combed red
hair above the rich front of starch. He couldn't speak, he just
nodded his head feebly, to indicate his relief.


When she'd gone, and he was alone, he experienced once
more the desperate need for peoplea need equal to that for
food. Because he felt in these moments as if he were the only
person living. So even when White Jack came, he greeted him
with a feeble rapture.


Again, the life-restoring glucose, the solid food, the coloured
pills.


A sound of many feet in the corridor, a tall stranger at the
door; Michael galvanizes-into a posture to defend and fight; a
group of people file in; he draws himself to the top of the bed,
to have a solid back, and then, with astonishing speed, points
his finger and darts his eye at one after the other, to separate
friend from foe.


"Ruthven, all right ... Stewart ... Colonel ... orderly ..."
from one to the other he span, and then, "Who's this?" lighting
upon the stranger, a tall, dark man of professional visage. They
all silently regarded him.


Colonel Calder spoke up: "This is Colonel Dane, you haven't
seen him before, he is on the staff of the hospital."


Michael said, with a foolish giggle:


"Welcome sir, and," he glanced at them quickly again,
"welcome all!" Seeing Miss Ruthven, he added, "Madame,"
and bowed.


The new doctor stood at the bed's end, facing him. He was
tall, strong, very dark, and impressively assured. He did not
smile at Michael's uncertain whimsy.


After a moment, he gave a brief nod to Colonel Calder, and
the troupe filed out in solemn order. But Major Stewart winked

[p. <i>153</i>]

A doctor Michael had not seen before, came briskly into the
room. He was middle-aged, plain, had a square, ugly moustache,
and wore black-rimmed glasses. He smelt strongly of the
operating room.


He said: "Let me see your foot," and bent down to examine
it. Michael had the impression that this surgeon did not think
of people <i>in toto</i>, but only as limbs. Michael to him was a foot,
or just part of a foot, an astragalous bone.


"H'mm, h'mm."


A terrible whiff of disinfectant flooded Michael's nostrils,
making him reel.


The surgeon grunted, stood up, paused in reflection, touched
the shin, canted his hand to a cutting angle, and departed.


In the happy breath of the sun the lawn grew quick and
vivid. The green of grass and shrubbery was peaceful and
inviting. So, peaceful, and like this, the days had been when
battles were fought in the Liri Valley. And on a day like this
the tanks did come, and would have met their doom, but... H.Q.
ordered dive bombers to attack, and his troop, with the most
advantageous anti-tank defence that ever was seen, was robbed
of victory. He had gone to his guns and handed back the
grenades, and told them: "The enemy tanks are not coming."


It seemed almost as if some bushes had been moved overnight.
Because surely the whole area here was a duplication of the Liri
defence. If that house mere was the farm-house, there were his
own guns, hidden in the same kind of trees and bushes, and

[p. <i>154</i>]

His attention was distracted by the sight of a young Scots
doctor who had come out of the hut and was walking away
from him. Something in his gait made him smile. He shouted:


"Left ... Left ... Left ... Left, Right, Left ..." and for
his life, the doctor could not help marching to this stentorian
beat. People at the end of the lawn were laughing.


"Left ... Left ... Left ... Medic-o-o Halt!" The doctor
halted click, and the people roared at him. "Dis-miss," ordered
Michael casually. The doctor got out of sight in no time.


The Submarine Kid had been attracted by Michael's impromptu
squad drill and came over to his bed. He drew his
attention to the presence of two beings in their neighbourhood,
a short barrel of a man he called Hollywood, and a cat. The
animal was several yards away, preparing to excrete. Nervously,
with tentative, delicate movements it rounded its back and
braced its legs. Hollywood threw a stone which missed and
landed on soft earth without the cat noticing it. He picked up
another one and said to them: "This'll get it."


Michael grew angry at once.


"Don't do that. I thought you were a circus man, and
understood animals. Leave it alone."


"Aw, fer Chris' sakes, what's eatin' yuh," Hollywood replied,
but he threw the stone far off, and walked away, leaving the
cat in peace.

[p. <i>155</i>]

"Why the hell," Michael asked the Submarine Kid, "does he
have to torment animals?"


"I guess he don't figure they matter."


"You do, I bet, though?"


"Sure, I wouldn't kill, not anymoreI don't forget the last
time, and that was ten years ago."


"What was it?"


"Just a bird."


Michael saw that unconsciously the sailor was imitating the
expression that must be on his own face. His cheek muscles
were drawn up over the bones in the way of a man watching
the sun; the mouth was firmly shut and creases arched from
splayed nostrils to its corners; the eyes were unnaturally watchful,
darting rapidly to the eyes, arms and legs of a possible
opponent.


"In all my life," Michael said, "I have only shot two creatures
a rabbit, and a chipmunk. The chipmunk was one second
chattering and the next second dead. He was very warm and
I could hold him inside my hand. I am still sorry that I killed
him."


Across from him, in one of the rooms, a man cried out in
fearful panic.


"Look outthere's the waterthe doors are locked tight.
She's rising, we're trapped, we'll drown ... At my knees, there's
no way out, at my belt, Oh, Christ! Oh, Christ! I don't want
to drown. Don't let me drown, God. The ship's sinking. Into

[p. <i>156</i>]

The last sound was a frightful shriek, prolonged, like a ship's
whistle, and then there was a thud, and silence.


He goes on drowning, Michael thought. Oh, how fortunate
I am not to be that man!


They gave him codeine, and a blissful feeling settled upon
him. He was easy, confident, happy.


Hal trundled him away on a stretcher cart into another
building. He seemed to race with the cart along the stone
corridor, and Michael enjoyed it; he would like to ride a motorcycle
through it. When he passed at a good speed a NO SMOKING
sign he held a match against it, and lit a cigarette he had hidden
in his pyjamas.


Soon he was at some swing doors; before he could plan how
to resist from his vulnerable position flat on the stretcher, strong,
adroit orderlies had pinioned his arms, and he was given an
intravenous injection. He fought to retain consciousness, but
in a short time was in a frightening whirl, and did not remember
much till he woke again in the little room.


It seemed to require considerable determination to write a
letter. Today he would do it. He would write to Jill and her
new English husband Tim in the simplest way he could.

[p. <i>157</i>]

Dear Jill and Timothy,


I have been very ill, but yesterday they did a skilful
operation which I think will take the poison out of my foot
and brain. Would you come to see me at ...


He finished it with great labour, and was quite confident it
would be sent when he got Miss Ruthven, in front of his eyes,
to write the address, seal the envelope, and go away to put on
a stamp.


He felt gay, as if he'd done a day's hard work. He saw a
beautiful woman and fancied she was an actress visiting the
wardthe senior doctor and others trailed deferentially behind
her. He called out:


"Do you want my autograph?"


The beautiful woman looked somewhat shaken, and glided on.


Later, a girl sped by, pushing a trolley of books, and he
called to her to stop. She did. He asked her to come in, but
she was afraid, and awkwardly pushed on. He had caught a
glimpse of the jackets and hard covers of books, in exciting
colours and designsit gave him a feeling of pleasure, this
tangible evidence of returning to the world of reality.


White Jack dropped in quickly towards evening. He looked
dubiously at him and walked over to the window. He carried
a clean white shirt. He muttered something about changing
before his date in the village. Nervously eyeing Michael, he
took off his shirt, and hurried to don the clean one. Michael at
once divined the reason for his nervousness. White Jack had
a soft, very white body. But he was feeling kindly towards the
sensitivity even of a White Jack. He said nothingmerely
watched the other smooth his hair and leave. He wondered who
was waiting in the village for the handsome kicker.


Later that evening, Pop, the senior orderly, brought him an

[p. <i>158</i>]

"This is a new game. You pick out people there you like
here's a pencilyou can put a ring around their faces."


Michael thought this would be amusing, and studied the faces
with interest. The photographs were all of men.


"Put a circle round someone you'd like to meet or have for
a friend," Pop added.


Michael remembered indistinctly a delightful game in a
magazine that required you from just such a gallery to separate
master criminals from pillars of society. In that game the ones
who looked like extortioners invariably proved to be elder
statesmen or Poets Laureate, and the faces of sweet abnegation
belonged to murderers of six. He remembered that in the
historical section he had placed among the elect the lovable
Judge Jeffreys and the Marquis de Sade. Accordingly, about
the present game he suspected, very faintly, something bogus,
and turned to Pop, feigning a clouded understanding.


"I put a circle round the people?" he asked.


"Not all of them," Pop answered patiently, "Round one or
two you'd like for a friend."


"But are they here in the hospital waiting to meet me?"


"Oh, no," said Pop, less patiently, "it's just a game like,
just for fun ..."


Michael studied the faces once more. This club was certainly
heterogeneous. God knew what brought them together, Spiritism,
backgammon, dirty movies? They were too well-dressed
for chess players.


"Well, this con man here," he said, finally, encircling the
most intelligent-looking, "and these two blackmailers," encircling

[p. <i>159</i>]

"That's the lot," Pop said, reaching for the magazine.


"Let me know if I win a prize."


"Aye," said Pop, sourly, "I'll do that," and went out.


He thought of the Marquis de Sade, whom the guessing game
had brought to his mind, and began to sketch out a verse in
his honour. He would have Sade, like the ancient in Plutarch,
refused at the infernal regions because of his excess of wickedness ...
The Marquis de Sade, who was very bahd, especially
with ladies, arrived one day, in the usual way, at Hades ...
He would knock at the gate and there would be no answer,
and a terrible pall would settle over the regionthe atmosphere
would be something like a Sunday in Toronto ... Until the
Devil, trying to be nice, thanked the Marquis warmly: "Your
services to vice ..." But, he could not be admitted. So, The
Marquis walked from the locked abyss, and over his shoulder
turned to hiss:


"Hey, talk English, will ya?" said Sergeant Knockwood,
appearing suddenly at the door, much stimulated by something,
"Hey, Mr. Gill!"


"What gives?"


"I was in the nurses' room, seeMiss Ruthven was in the

[p. <i>160</i>]

"What?"


"Dementia peacock. Shitzophrenia, Oh, hell, I can't remember
something oya."


"Paranoia?"


"That's it. Then something mania, and I'm telling you,
boy," he opened his hands six inches, "my whole f-----g file's
about this thick!"


Michael laughed till the tears ran down his face. "They're
baffled," he cried, "baffled."


"But you know," Knockwood said, "I think it's these f-----g
doctors that are stark, staring nuts. Take that big bastard from
the other wing, Jesus! he comes plodding into the ward the
other night like f-----g Boris Karloff, bloody great eyes rolling
around, and his great big mitts out like he wanted to strangle
someone."


"Oh, sure," Michael agreed, "they're all round the bend.
Why, if we worked in that ward for long we'd be the same."


"Yeah," said Knockwood objectively, "I guess you're not
far wrong."


A new voice broke into their laughter.


"Which one of ye's the Saint?"


It was a slim, short, well-built, pugnacious young man, his
left arm off near the shoulder, who couldn't have looked more
Scottish with kilts and a bagpipe.


Knockwood nodded toward Michael and gave up the chair.
He went out saying he would have another look at the files.


"Ca' me Scotty," said the newcomer, sitting down, "I think
mebbe ye could help me," screwing up his eyes with canny
effect.


"Of course."

[p. <i>161</i>]

"Ye'll obsairve that I'm no hale manthat I've got something
missin'."


"Yes."


"Namely ma airm."


[Poor bastard].


"I'll tell ye what a' happened."


A few days before he had been on leave from his ship in
Glasgy. He had gone first to a pub for a drink, taken a cab to
a rooming place, and got out of the cab, and ... black-out!
He had woken up here in the hospital, hundreds of miles south,
his arm gone.


"And you don't know <i>how</i> it happened?"


"I dinna ken at a'."


"Was there a raid?"


"Nae a plane in the sky."


"A car hit you?"


He shook his head.


"Won't the docs tell you anything?"


"They say they dinna ken a thing."


"Well, that's honest."


Scotty laughed. "They'd better let me oot o' here or Ah'll
belt somebody ower the snoot, and walk oot on ma ain ... I
used to be champion o' Perthshire, ye ken."


"I believe you."


Scotty got up and shadow-boxed with his one good arm.


"I'll feet the whole lot o' them."


"You'll what?"


"I'll feet the whole lot."


"Oh ... that's the way, Scotty, but I tell you, tomorrow,
ask the Red Cross girlshe'll find out for you."


"That's no' a bad notion."

[p. <i>162</i>]

"And you'll be able to go back to your family."


"Aye!"


"And your girl."


Scotty brightened up at the thought.


Michael asked: "She's nice?"


"She's the best ye ever saw," said Scotty, "and I'll wed her
afore the year's oot."


Miss Ruthven, quivering with sympathy, took Scotty away;
the lights were put out soon after, and Michael fell asleep.


In dream he felt himself to be just a torso. He had been cut
in half. Some sort of machine like a guillotine had rung shut,
severing him in two. How much of you need there be to be
still a vessel of life? He was now mostly eyes. He thought of
himself being two eyes; that was alllike an animal seen in the
dark. Imagine being cut and cut again till you were only a
seeing spirit. He saw himself being pursued, and pausing in
flight at the end of long corridors to look back at the pursuer
there was all of him, a pair of bright eyes in the darkness.


"The C.O. is coming in to see you," said La Comba, the
next afternoon. He smiled and nodded. The colonel appeared
and sat down on the only chair.


Michael offered him a cigarette, but he thanked him, no, he
would smoke his own.


The colonel said the usual things, and waited for him to come

[p. <i>163</i>]

The colonel was impatient about this. Michael told him of
the beating on the ship, and the colonel said:


"Yes, I believe you had a rough crossing."


"I wanted to tell you, sir, so that those men will be prevented
from attacking other patients. They should be in jail."


"Yes, well, I'll try to obtain information on conditions on
board there  that's why you wished to see me?"


Michael sat up and said simply:


"All the time on the ship, except when I was with the good
orderlies, I felt I was at the mercy of strangers  in fact, once
I thought the ship had been captured by the enemy. Well, here,
there has been no brutality, not to me at least  though there
have been threats of it, and I have sat here and watched a gang
of orderlies rush into that room," he pointed across the passage,
"and beat up a man there  but even here I have felt away
from everyone I knew, and sometimes, when I woke in the
morning, after the insulin treatment, I cried out, just to see a
human being." The colonel drew in his breath, and when
Michael glanced at him he saw there were tears at the corner
of his eyes.


Michael went on hurriedly, as if he hadn't noticed.


"That's why I wanted to see you. It would make me feel
more that everything was under some control, that the authorities
were responsible for my protection."


"I see," the colonel said, gruffly.


"And there was something else, too, only, only it has gone
out of my mind."

[p. <i>164</i>]

"Was there anything you remember in the action, besides
your being wounded? Perhaps ..."


"No, now I remember, I wanted to ask you if I had been
given a medal?"


The colonel shook his head, "No, not that I know of, I
haven't seen your name on orders."


Michael didn't speak for a while. He laughed with embarrassment.


"You understand, sir, there was no action I was in for which
there was any ... I mean, I just heard someone say ..."


"Well, now, is there anything further you wish to tell me?"


"Just that if Colonel Calder is interested in my side of the
psychiatric carpet, I can talk about it all week-end without
pausing for breath."


The colonel smiled:


"What about the other patients? But I'll tell him what you
say. Good-day now, Gill.


"Thank you very much, sir."


When the colonel had gone, Michael felt that he had not
adequately told him of the brutality on the ship. He should
write it all down, then they would have a document to deal
with. He got out his stubby pencil and cheap ruled paper and
began. It required tremendous will power and concentration.


"I was wounded on May 23rd or 24th, 1944, on the Adolf
Hitler Line near Pontecorvo, Italy, while leading my troop into
position in support of the Carleton York offensive. I was taken
to the nearest Field Dressing Station."


In this brief, direct style he told of delirium from poison in
the blood at Caserta, his boarding the English hospital ship,
and the events leading up to the attack. At this point he could
not just then write any more and set the pages aside. Hal brought
his dinner to him.

[p. <i>165</i>]

A padre walked in. He stared at him uncertainly for what
seemed a full minute. Michael, looking up, tried to imagine
what the padre thought. Just, perhaps, that here was an emaciated
young man in a plain little cement room. He would never
guess that in this room the Crucifixion had been re-enacted,
or that a Roman Emperor had died lamenting the glory of the
world, or that from a photograph a son had been chosen for
adoption. He was a plain man with knobbly features and a
reddish face. His manner was a blend of parish heartiness and
a manly roughness which those who had not been at the front
might suppose was the mode there. Since Michael in the last
few weeks had seen several padres pass by but none enter, he
assumed that they had been warned he was no gentle lamb to
be gathered into the flock. This one had evidently burst in on
the spur of the moment.


"Ah-ha, grub-time, eh?" he boomed.


Michael, a little startled, swallowed hastily, and said: "Quite."


The padre sat down.


"Knock on the foot, eh?"


"Yes."


The padre lowered his voice and assorted his features
confidentially.


"How did it happen?" he asked, a bushy eyebrow flickering.


"Some Kraut fired a mortar shell at me; I knew there was
something in the air, so I dived down by a tree. But it splattered
me from head to foot like a fountain pen."


The padre inflated his cheeks, and his long upper lip and
chin formed a vertical cliff wall.


Grunt.


Michael couldn't interpret the grunt accurately. He didn't
know whether it implied that he, Michael, should have remained
upright and had his head blown off, or that the details displeased

[p. <i>166</i>]

"Where was this?" he asked, gruffly.


"Near Pontecorvo. This was after the Liri campaign, after
Cassino."


"Lot of Minnies there?"


"Oh, yes, this was the soft white underbelly of the axis,
shelling day and night."


Grunt.


"How'd you keep alive?"


"Quite safe in the slit trenches, as long as you didn't get too
curious."


Once again a look of embarrassment distorted the already
uneven features of the clergyman. Now, he glanced sharply at
the empty plate Michael placed on the table. He got up very
quickly, saying:


"Must go, patients to see," and was gone.


Michael looked at the plate. Of course! There was no knife
or fork on it ... No wonder the padre was alarmed.


Next morning, after breakfast, the doctor who did the
inspection with La Comba was Major Stewart. There was always
something about him Michael found very likeable; it was a kind
of modesty and masculine dignity. He smiled amiably, and
walked slowly and deliberately, as he always did, into the cell.
He was carrying something.


He said to him, "I heard you didn't like that sensational
novel, so I got you another book." Michael knew he referred

[p. <i>167</i>]

Michael looked at it, uncertainly. The binding was rich and
handsome. He nervously lifted the cover. He picked up the book
and sniffed the dusty pages. He turned them over  a marvellous
tapestry in colour  <i>The Lady and the Unicorn</i>  page after page,
the most perfect tapestries ever produced, the <i>History of Tarquin</i>,
archers, knights, men-at-arms, medieval ladies, flowers, white
palfreys on a black ground  such a prodigality of artistic love
and energy ...


He shook his head.


"Don't you like it?" asked the major.


He answered quietly:


"It is so rich  too much."


La Comba took it courteously away from him.


They were going.


"But," Michael called to him, "that you should think of it...!"


Michael was talking to the Submarine Kid when he heard a
voice saying:


"<i>Buon giorno</i>," and saw before him the short, dark, cocky-looking
man who was known as Hollywood.


"<i>Buon giorno</i>," he replied.


"<i>Come sta</i>?" The voice had a strong American accent.


"<i>Sto bene, prego, e lei</i>?"


"<i>Bene, grazie</i>."

[p. <i>168</i>]

The short man was likeable and humorous, despite his conceit.
He swaggered to the end of the bed and sat on it.


"<i>Lei era in Italia</i>?" he asked.


"<i>Si</i>, twice."


"<i>Dover</i>?"


"<i>Napoli, Roma, Firenze, Venezia, e pochi villaggi, anche</i>."


"You wounded in Italy?"


"<i>Si</i>."


"<i>Dove</i>?"


"<i>Pontecorvo, vicino Cassino</i>."


"O.K. Pal, what's your name?"


"Gill."


"Benucci. Call me Ben."


"This is the Kid."


Ben shook hands with both of them  a hard, tough-guy
handshake. He told them he had been born in Naples and had
come to the United States when he was only six. He had spent
his life in circuses and show-business and was in Hollywood
doing a movie when he was drafted. In the movie he was a
trainer with an animal act.


The Kid asked: "Didja meet any of the stars?"


"Sure, for Christ sake," Ben answered, "they don't mean
f  k all."


"Howdya mean?"


"That's all build-up. They're just ordinary guys, if they ain't
nuts, which a lot of them are."


"Some of them are out of the ordinary, aren't they?" Michael
protested.


"Like who?"


"Well, that drama critic in the <i>French Pavilion</i> ... very
intelligent actor."


"Oh, sure. It's all hokum."

[p. <i>169</i>]

"What about Stan Rivers?" the Kid asked.


"You rigger he's the fine, clean-livin' type, eh?"


"Yeah, I do," the Kid replied.


"Big hero?"


"Yeah."


"You're one of the suckers the industry feeds on."


"Tell me," Michael said, "there are some eccentric characters
in that town?"


"Jesus, I'll say, lotta limp f_____g handshakes on Sunset Boulevard,
and you don't trust no bastard or they'll f_____g skinya."


"Anyways," the Kid objected, "I bet they're not ordinary
guys like you say. They got, uh, personality."


Ben was disgusted.


"Listen," he said, "give me the dough an' I'll build up any
guy's got brains enough to dodge the traffic, an' I'll put that
guy over as a big hero, a great lover, or any other goddamn
thing, that's how easy it is ...'Course everybody fits into a
type, but that's the on'y ..."


"He'd hafta act, wouldn't he?" the Kid broke in.


"Act, my ass. He's just gotta follow directions. Take you,
you're the nice-guy type. In a war movie you're the guy with
a girl at home an' you getta letter the engagement's busted, an'
you go out  mad, see?  an' clean out the machine-gun nest...
that sorta crap. But youra typical type like I say."


"What sorta type's the Saint here?"


Benucci turned his shrewd showman's eyes on Michael.


"He ain't a lover-boy. Naw ... he's a casting problem. But
I tell you, if we was doin' a circus picture, see, we'd make him
the barker."


The Kid said: "Ya mean one of those guys that says: Roll
right up La-dees an' Gennulmen an' see the pin-headed
man?"


"Yeah."

[p. <i>170</i>]

They all laughed, and the laughter of Benucci had in it a note
of happy malice. He said he had to go, and motioned for the
Submarine Kid to follow him.


In the corridor, Michael heard him say:


"Yeah, he speaks Italian."


Dr. MacBriarty sauntered through the doorway immediately
after. He made him smile, as usual, he seemed so young and
informal to be a doctor, though his informality appealed to him.
He wandered over to the window.


"How are you today?" he asked, looking whimsically Scottish.


"I feel relieved you've decided to stop shocking me with
insulin."


"Oh, that. Well, it's built you up a bit ... By the way, have
you ever read Rabelais?"


"No, unfortunately, I've never got round to it."


"That's strange."


"Why? There must be the odd person who hasn't?"


"It doesn't matter ... I wanted to let you know you can
relax about one thing  your syphilis test is negative."


"That's a relief. Though I haven't borrowed any pipes lately."


MacBriarty laughed, and moved restlessly about the room.


"Tell me, have you ever wanted to commit murder, remove
someone from the world?"


Michael stared. In Pop's picture game he must have picked
out more murderers than could be ascribed to chance.


"Only travelogue commentators."


"Have you ever had a homosexual experience?"


They must have been homosexual murderers to boot.


"No, not that I recall."


"One last question. You have shouted out a name many
times. Do you know someone called Hobby?"

[p. <i>171</i>]

Michael turned sober. "Oh, yes," he assured him. "She's real.
I couldn't have made her up  not so nice, anyway."


"I see. I'll tell you, frankly, your case baffles me completely.
I can't make head or tail of it.'


Michael laughed.


"Never mind. Just let me out of here, and I'll get well. You're
probably aiming too high  this is about as sane as I get."


"It beats me," MacBriarty said, retiring, "it beats me to hell!'


Just before dinner he was chatting with the Submarine Kid when
he recognized, passing the door, the tall black-haired orderly
who spoiled for fights with patients. It was he who had chased
the runaway patient from the Birmingham train and beaten him
horribly on the ground. Michael still could remember in his
mind's eye the blows flailing down in the lantern's light. He
was to him one of those men that everyone must meet somewhere,
a sworn enemy, and in early times one would have killed
the other on sight. The orderly recognized him too, and turned
back. As he entered the door, Michael felt all the familiar
symptoms of disintegrating fear and rallying anger, and he knew
he <i>must</i> summon up courage to down this man.


"Ah," said the orderly, baring his teeth, and walking close
to the bed, "Ah-ha, so the fighting boy is sitting up now, eh?"


Michael didn't answer, just fastened his eyes on the eyes of
the orderly. The man was disturbed by the look but seemed to
feel obliged to continue his menacing raillery.


"Now we have a nice noo cast, with our big toe sticking out.
Isn't that just too lovely ... does it tickle?"


He made to touch the foot, which would cause him agony,
and Michael instinctively grabbed a book, holding its edges
down.


The old remembered look of this man and White Jack, a
mixture of brutality and fear, glinted in the orderly's eyes.

[p. <i>172</i>]

"So you'd strike an orderly, would you? You haven't been
tamed yet, eh?"


"If you touch my foot I'll break your wrist!"


His eyes held the orderly a long while and finally broke his
will; he stepped back uncertainly to the door.


His name was called impatiently from outside and he hurried
away, compensating for his defeat with a feeble threat as be
went.


The Submarine Kid said:


"Phreeo, you told 'im, Saint!


After the war he would take out a canoe on War Feathers
Lake and follow the streams through the bush as far as he could,
from lake to lake, and then portage till he came to Deer Lake,
and there camp. Provisions for ten days and books weighing
down the bow. Build a camp fire and sleep away from the black
flies. Dive off the rock before breakfast and swim under the
cedar branches. Sizzling bacon in the frying-pan. Move never
a muscle when a deer stood at the water's edge. Wait and watch,
till, no matter how still you were, and close you watched, it
would vanish, as if it never was. Find a cool shady place. Read
the books you had never read, because they deserved, and you
had not been able to give them, your whole mind. Rabelais,
of course, Montaigne, and La Bruyre. Then, odd brilliant books
like <i>Vathek, Marius the Epicurean</i>, Buckingham's <i>Rehearsal</i>, and
the <i>Tale of Genji</i>. Some stories and essays by Salent, not yet
read, Prescott's Conquest and his Spanish history. And then,
after reading all around him  William Blake. What days they

[p. <i>173</i>]

Morning.


With one overpowering impulse he climbed his height against
the wall to draw the full-length portrait of a mana savage,
proud, noble man, and sank down on the bed. Underneath he
wrote, M D L X I V, and threw the crayon on the table.


From where he lay it looked like a drawing of genius. It
looked to have been created, as it had been, in a frenzy of
artistic feeling. It had the unity and completeness of a spontaneous,
and almost instantaneous work. He was proud of it.


The breakfast orderlies: White Jack and another.


White Jack spilled the tray in his amazement.


"For Christ's sake, Saint, did you do that? What the hell is
it?" He broke into a jeering laugh. The other man quipped:


"Looks like a fg Gyppo."


"You fools!" Michael lashed them, "It's good. It's very good.
It's worth this whole hospital. Don't dare laugh at it."


The two were impressed, despite themselves.


"I know," said the other, "he's an artist."


"Yeah," said White Jack, "guess so."


When they had gone, Michael, puzzled, leaned forward in his
bed. The figure seen from the angle they had seen it was
distortedthat explained their jeeringit had to be looked at
from where he had drawn it.

[p. <i>174</i>]

In turning back, he saw a legend inscribed on the wall above
his pillow


MICHAEL GILL PROFESSOR OF ENGLISH LITERATURE.


That was a deluded, sick thing to do. He must have written
that yesterday. Today, he was too sane.


After breakfast Pop came. He stood for a while, his back to
Michael, ordering the staff in their duties. Everything about him
suggested authority, the stiffness of his back, the ridges of his
neck. He could have been the most autocratic of R.S.M's. Even
White Jack knew the pecking order when Pop was there.


Having finished his directing of the staff, Pop turned round
and walked into the room. It was two weeks since he'd seen
Michael. He looked at him slowly, as if thinking much he would
not express. He made no reference to the drawing. He said:


"You look to be a well man, now."


"I suppose I am, Pop."


"When you came here on the train from Birmingham you
weighed seventy pounds exact. We thought you wouldn't live
a week. You had a name for being a rough customer. And when
you were with the other patients you wanted them all to steal
arms and shoot their way out of the hospital. You called them
your commandos. The orderlies were afraid of you. They
couldn't keep you in bed. They put you on the floor, and you
wouldn't let anyone stand over you. You said they were giants.
So they sent in a dwarf to give you food, and make you laugh.
They had to keep your spirits up."


"Dwarf? How is that possible?"


"God's truth. He was a local man, working in the garden,
you said he was your court jester. Whatever happened to you
on that ship made you not trust nobody. What'd they do to
you?"


"They beat me. Four of them. <i>Our own people</i>. Not the

[p. <i>175</i>]

"Did you tell the doctors that they beat you?"


"Yes, but they only half believed me. They thought it was
hallucination and persecution mania. Do you believe me?"


"Oh, aye, men are often beaten up by orderlies. Sometimes
patients fight like wildcats. But if I ever see an orderly puttin'
the boots to a patient, I stop him."


"A mental patient is a child, Pop." His voice sank: "That
should never be done to a child. It had never happened to me
before. My kind of people don't hit each other. Not with
blows. Not a man lying down. They hit with wordsthey say
cruel, vile thingsthat is their way of hitting. I wasn't used to
the other way."


A look of intelligent understanding came into Pop's eyes,
and some sympathy.


"Aye," he said, "is that what they do?"


"But I don't know if that was the worst. Oh, yes, it was the
worstthe afternoon they attacked. But after, it was so terrible
I couldn't make you realise, Pop. The dreams I had in the cell
of the ship: drug dreams, and dreams of madness. Sometimes
they were wonderful: dreams of paradise; at other times they
were terrifying: of evil and blood. I have been into hell and
heaven."


"You have seen every good thing and wicked thing."


"That's it, Pop."


"You must have a strong mind to come out of it."


In the corridor Miss Ruthven's voice could be heard, and
Pop went to speak to her. He returned with a packet of old
air-mail letters, tied in string.

[p. <i>176</i>]

"Nurse says to give you these." He handed them to him and
went out.


Michael was surprised, and removed the string with impatient
curiosity. How familiar they were, the blue air-mail letters,
flimsy, folded, postmarked, ragged at the corners. But look,
what was this scruffy pencil scribbling on the backs? Oh, yes,
he'd written something about each person on his letter. Evidently
he had written on them twice, first, quite reasonably, and
secondly, in terms of bathetic melodrama which showed there
must be seas of hog-wash in his soul. His heart beat fast. There
was a little card toofrom Francesca, the girl at Lodano. He
read his scribble: Francesca was inside me, and outside meI
breathed her. Oh, brother! And this, on Uncle Dermot's: 'From
the hair of his head to the soles of his feet an Elizabethan!" Oh,
what sickening tripethat ass, an Elizabethan! On Cousin
Jane's, as a postscript, once her family might have made themselves
kings instead of crowning others. Ye merry gods! And
look at this ferocious comment on his father: Did he ever make
one, just one, single invention that worked? What had he added
to the first fulsome praise of Jill? She made me die a thousand
times over a phantoma slight exaggeration. He looked inside
her envelopewhat had she said to him? Darling Mike ...
loved to hear from you ... So intrigued by your present ...
Rabelais, though a friar of sorts, was most happily ribald. Ah,
so that's what MacBriarty had referred toall the doctors had
been peering at these letters.


Ugh! he shook his head in mortification, and quickly tore
up all the letters into little pieces, into confetti, and looked
round where to put them, saw the ideal place, the bed-pan, and
threw them in.


They moved him late at night into the officers' ward, and

[p. <i>177</i>]

There was now a patient on his feet, pottering about in
pyjamas. When he saw Michael he turned on him a long,
disturbing look, from large brown eyes. Michael must have
appeared to him alarmed, for the other said, in rhyming couplet:


"Please excuse the hospital stare ... I couldn't figure who
you were."


They introduced themselves, and Michael was pleased by
something humorous and humane in him. He got back into
bed and silently absorbed the impressions of the ward. After
breakfast, served by orderlies he did not know, he lay watching
and listening to the patients and people who came in. During
the late morning, there appeared a girl in uniform, a lieutenant

[p. <i>178</i>]
[p. <i>179</i>]

In the afternoon, suddenly, Jill and Tim appeared at his bedside.
He was startled a little to see her, instantly noticing and
recalling her dark eyes and the beautiful modelling of her face.
She came quickly up to him, and he grasped her arm, kissing
her cheek. Tim went and asked some patients, with his
characteristic charm of manner, if he could borrow a chair;
there was a concerted attempt to help him, for all had been
alerted by Jill's entrance, and in the scramble the chair fell on
the floor. Jill giggled, Tim righted the chair, and sat down
beside her. He looked very well in his naval uniform, which
seemed to carry more braids and ribbons than usual. Jill said
they had been directed to the ward by a Red Cross girl, and
that she seemed to like Michael. This pleased him, as she knew
it would, and she smiled in the uniquely delightful way he
remembered.


The sound of a plane flying close over the roof startled him.


"Those damn planes!" he said, in fear and exasperation.


"They are annoying," she agreed.


Tim took some paper books out of Jill's purse and handed
them to him. He looked, and saw they were all detective stories,
and one was called <i>Death in a Nursing Home</i>.


He refused them with as much courtesy as he could muster.


"Thank you very much, but I could not read books like that
now ..."


Jill said she had heard from someone of the awful time on
the ship, and looked at him questioningly.


"Yes," he said, "it's all true. It was like that."

[p. <i>180</i>]

Her eyes were large and very beautiful. "The orderlies on
the ship ...?"


"Yes."


She looked very sympathetic and said:


"Mike, it's all over now; you will forget it. After a time,
you ..."


"I will never forget it," he said. In a moment he added: "They
were our own people. Besides, if my experience on the ship
isn't significant, nothing is."


This stopped her speaking, then she asked: "Are you all
right, now?"


"Yes, Jill, as soon as they took out the infected bone, I was
all right."


Again, overhead, the planes seemed to be diving down on
the hospital.


"Those bloody planes!" he said, afraid.


Jill said: "They shouldn't be allowed near the hospital."


"I told the colonel."


Tim spoke up, hurriedly:


"At Dunkirk we had all the planes we cared for ..."


Jill explained to him: "Tim commanded one of the little ships
that carried the army over the channel."


"Oh," Michael murmured, with genuine admiration, "very
good."


"I'd see these blasted planes swooping down at us," said Tim,
"and they kept it up so long, I got afraid, yes, afraid, and angry,
and the more afraid, the more angry, and after a while, I thought
only of getting our guns to fire back at them." He checked
himself as if he had spoken too freely, and sat silent for a while
after.


A suspicion grew in Michael's mind. Wasn't Tim assuming
that because he had been mad, that he must have gone mad

[p. <i>181</i>]

"I have come across somethinga European artist has told
the newspapers he feels he can be more objective about men
suffering if he doesn't come into actual contact with them. So
he has painted some gruesome pictures, from New York, of
men with appalling wounds. I'll show you, but don't let Jill
see, they're too morbid." He handed him an illustrated magazine
showing bloody limbs and smashed faces. The colour contrasts
were very effective.


Tim was all interest, and said the appropriate, witty things,
and Jill was, of course, amusingly distressed at being denied
the sight of them. But Michael was not feeling much amused
by anything.


Just then one of the up-patients from the other ward passed
along the corridor. He was twirling an imaginary lasso, and
muttering cowboy talk. Michael saw their eyes glance over at
him, and he said contemptuously: "He has no personality of his
own, so he models himself upon some Hollywood hero."


They shook a little at the bitterness of his voice, but made
no comment.


When the man had gone, he said: "But there were some
interesting guys in the ward, there was Scotty, for instance."


"Tell us about Scotty," Jill said. It was part of her charm to
feel this spontaneous interest in people she had merely heard
about.


"Well," he said, with some enthusiasm, "Scotty's a boxer,
and very, very Scottish. One day he was on leave in Glasgow,

[p. <i>182</i>]

"Lost his arm?" Tim asked. "Do you mean he mislaid it?"


Jill laughed, but Michael's face was quite unsmiling.


She said, most out of character, "Oh, Mike, where's your
sense of humour?"


He made a shrugging expression with his mouth and eyes.


A whiff from the gangrened leg assailed his nostrils, and he
tucked the blanket more securely round it. He also poured some
powder down on the cast.


"Do you notice that much?" he asked.


"Well, now you mention it," said Tim, "I do."


Tim must be really annoyed to say that, he thought. I suppose
I'm not very pleasant.


The talk floundered then, despite Jill's efforts to divert them,
and at this point, unfortunately, a nurse came to indicate they
should go.


At least Jill's smile was friendly as they left.


He felt dissatisfied with himself for being so disagreeable to
Tim. He should not have seen them at all. It was better to be
alone until you were quite well. Friends misunderstood as well
as enemies. He would forget it all! The planes at Dunkirk.


He was sitting up, severe and disconsolate, when La Comba
came in the ward.


"Hi, Saint," she greeted him.

[p. <i>183</i>]

"Hello, La Comba," he answered, forcing himself to be polite.


"Brought your watch for you."


He thanked her and strapped it on his wrist.


"And this," she said, giving him a tiny press notice.


It was his entry in a casualty list.


WOUNDED


Royal Canadian Artillery


Gill, Michael L. N., Lieut.


"What price glory," he murmured.


He tried to be cheerful with La Comba, but failed dismally.
He was back in the world of watches. He did like her, but was
glad when she went away.


He sat brooding on the inevitable let-down of everything,
when a thought as depressing as it was convincing entered his
mind. If Hobby even should come in the door he would be
indifferent. The mind, too, needed lineaments to gratify its
desire. She was wonderful, Hobby, but what would they talk
about? He had loved her with the sincerity of a madman. He
was no longer mad, and he no longer loved. I will never seek
Hobby out, he swore to himself, I will spare her and spare
myself that sickening disillusionment.


After breakfast, next morning, he spoke to no one, but sat
up, reading his book. It was nine o'clock. (He was often glancing
at his watch nowthe watch that had been returned when he
became well). Sometimes a new idea came to him, about his
experience, and he put down his book and gazed out unseeingly.
The region, the realm he had been in was unacknowledged,
unendurable. Only a few lunatics, a few tortured men, a few
geniuses had entered there. In the normal world man dilutes

[p. <i>184</i>]

A chair moved on his right. He was conscious that the nurse
or doctor who sat behind the glass partition was every now
and then peering out at the patients. He supposed this was part
of observation. Another part, probably, was the colonel coming
to talk to him. Michael, frowning with concentration, heard his
voice.


"Good morning."


"Good morning, sir," he answered, stiffly, politely.


"You sit there like the King of Siam."


"The King of Siam," he smiled. "I saw him once at the
Derby, looking just like the people who aren't the King of Siam
probably a neurosis."


Calder sat down. He looked closely at Michael.


"You haven't shaved," he said reproachfully.


"No. I haven't got my razor yet."


"Well, they'll send it in."


"Can you tell me more about my case, now?"


"You had osteomyelitisyou were seriously illpoison
going through your systemyou were losing weight so much
that I think if we hadn't operated you would have disappeared
all your mental processes were speeded upyour brain was
like a racing motorover-stimulated. You survived because of
a terrific will to live."


"Yes?" Michael answered, pleased at this rare praise from a
doctor. "I felt everything amplified forty times. Also, I thought
every chance thing had significance. There's something I want
to know, did the C.O. speak to you about my complaint of
being beaten up on the ship?" His voice trembled as he asked
this.

[p. <i>185</i>]

"He did mention it to me."


"Insane persons, or someone in delirium and virtually
insane like me, seems to be at the mercy of vicious orderlies.
This must be so in mental hospitals everywhere. Now, if the
medical authorities won't protect them then there should be
people present from outside the medical service to see they are
safe. Or doesn't it matter," he asked, with stinging sarcasm,
"what is done to madmen?"


Colonel Calder was looking puzzled and annoyed.


"Of course you were raising quite a riot thereyou wanted
the men to revolt!"


"I forgot they were in the army still. I thought of them as
a docile herd being ordered about."


"And I might add that somewhere along the line you managed
to knock out an orderly stone cold on the floor."


"I'm glad to hear it. With the good orderlies I had nothing
but kindness."


"In the old days," said Calder, "well, not so very old, a
hundred years ago, insane patients in England were taken out
every Sunday and flogged ..."


Michael gasped at this, and the colonel added:


"They thought it drove the devil out of them."


Michael was stunned by the callousness of the remark. He
told the colonel, again with emotion, with a feeling of most
tender seriousness, of the artist who was driven insane by
Whistler's stealing a commission from him, and of how he was
found sitting before a heap of gold coinsthe motif of the
rooms he should have designedshovelling them up wildly
with clutching fingers.


The colonel, perplexed, made an uncommittal answer, and
Michael went on to something else:

[p. <i>186</i>]

"One more thing, sir... What did you think of my writings?"


"Writings?"


"I wrote poems, or sometimes I just spoke themsome were
in Italian ..."


"I don't know anything about that."


"I guess they weren't earth-shaking," said Michael sadly,
"though one or two were good, and at the time, they all seemed,
well, wonderful ... You did like my jokes?"


Colonel Calder nodded, "Oh, yes, they amused us."


That was something.


The colonel got up, "I think you can leave tomorrow for
number Four General. How do you like that?"


"Very much. Thank you, sir."


"Good-bye, Gill, in case I don't see you tomorrow."


They shook hands.


The dreadful, marvellous journey was over. He had come
out of the Forests of the Night.


THE END

